Tennessee, session 114, SB2108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 7, Chapter 68, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A law enforcement agency shall communicate with local governmental entities
and officials to submit quarterly reports to the centralized immigration enforcement
division of the department of safety, created in § 4-3-2014, and the appropriate federal
official regarding illegal activities, including criminal gang activities and violations of
federal immigration laws, of persons who are not lawfully present in the United States.
The law enforcement agency shall include in its quarterly reports those persons arrested
or otherwise detained for violations of federal immigration laws.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-1-425, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection (f) and redesignating existing subsection (f) accordingly:
(f) The department of finance and administration shall report to the governor and
the speakers of the senate and house of representatives on or before December 31,
2026, and each December 31 thereafter, the annual cost incurred by this state for public
schools, including public higher education institutions, prisons, hospitals, and social
services agencies to provide benefits and services to persons not lawfully present in the
United States.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 58, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
SB2108
011402
- 1 -

(a) A local governmental entity shall report to the centralized immigration
enforcement division:
(1) Violations of ordinances and resolutions subject to the imposition of
civil penalties by individuals who are not United States citizens or qualified aliens;
and
(2) The receipt of public benefits by individuals who are not United States
citizens or qualified aliens.
(b) A law enforcement agency, as defined in § 7-68-102, shall report individuals
who are not United States citizens or qualified aliens who are charged or convicted of
criminal offenses to the centralized immigration enforcement division.
(c) An employee's or official's failure to report in violation of this section is a
Class A misdemeanor.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011402